Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2169.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1923(5) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, added November 12, 2025 (P.L.156, No.45), is amended to read:Section 1923. Department of Education.The following apply to appropriations to the Department of Education:* * *(5) The amount of money set aside under section 2509.8 of the Public School Code of 1949 shall be allocated to each approved [private] special education school with a day tuition determined to be less than $32,000 during the 2010-2011 school year. The allocation shall be no less than 175% of the amount allocated in 2015-2016 fiscal year.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2169PN2811 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021